Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.200

Notice to creditors and other parties in interest.

(1) A general receiver shall give notice of the receivership by publication in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county or counties in which estate property is known to be located once a week for three consecutive weeks, the first notice to be published within thirty days after the date of appointment of the receiver; and by mailing notice to all known creditors and other known parties in interest within thirty days after the date of appointment of the receiver. The notice of the receivership shall include the date of appointment of the receiver; the name of the court and the case number; the last day on which claims may be filed with the court and mailed to or served upon the receiver; and the name and address of the debtor, the receiver, and the receiver's attorney, if any. For purposes of this section, all intangible property of a person is deemed to be located in the county in which an individual owner thereof resides, or in which any entity owning the property maintains its principal administrative offices.

(2) The notice of the receivership shall be in substantially the following form:

IN THE SUPERIOR COURT, IN AND FOR

COUNTY, WASHINGTON

[Case Name]

)

Case No.

)

)

NOTICE OF RECEIVERSHIP

)

)

_____

)

TO CREDITORS AND OTHER PARTIES IN INTEREST:

PLEASE TAKE NOTICE that a receiver was appointed for , whose last known address is , on , .

YOU ARE HEREBY FURTHER NOTIFIED that in order to receive any dividend in this proceeding you must file proof of claim with the court within 30 days after the date of this notice. If you are a state agency, you must file proof of claim with the receiver within 180 days after the date of this notice. A copy of your claim must also be either mailed to or served upon the receiver.

_____

RECEIVER

Attorney for receiver (if any): _____

Address: _____

[ 2011 c 34 s 7; 2004 c 165 s 22.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.